District of Columbia statutes.
28-4034

Legal action.

(a)

In addition to any other remedies otherwise available to a consumer, a consumer who suffers loss as a result of any violation of this chapter may bring an action to recover damages. The court shall award a consumer who prevails in an action twice the amount of any pecuniary loss, costs, reasonable attorneys’ fees, and any equitable relief that the court determines is appropriate.

(b)

The remedies under this chapter shall be cumulative and not exclusive and shall be in addition to any other legal or equitable remedies otherwise available to the consumer.

Oct. 26, 2010, D.C. Law 18-241, § 5, 57 DCR 7550
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, §§ 83(c), 83(f), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 18-241 which did not affect this section as codified; and substituted “this chapter” for “this act” wherever it appears.